Washington statutes.
RCW 16.04.010

Trespassing animals—Restraint—Damages and costs.

Any person suffering damage done by any horses, mules, donkeys, cattle, goats, sheep, swine, or any such animals, which shall either trespass upon any land enclosed by lawful fence as provided in chapter 16.60 RCW or trespass while running at large in violation of chapter 16.24 RCW may retain and keep in custody such offending animals until the owner or person having possession of such animals shall pay such damage and costs, or until good and sufficient security be given for the same.

[ 1989 c 286 s 1; 1925 ex.s. c 56 s 1; 1893 c 31 s 1; RRS s 3090.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 286: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1989 c 286 s 26.]

Damages to stock on unfenced railroad: RCW 81.52.050 through 81.52.070.

Pleading answer in action to recover property distrained: RCW 4.36.140.